Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 1. Structure and Purpose.

Sec. 21.84.005.
Representative form of government.

A society has a representative form of government if

the society has a supreme governing body constituted as described in (b) or (c) of this section;

officers of the society are elected either by the supreme governing body or by the board of directors;

only benefit members are eligible for election to the supreme governing body or an intermediate assembly or to the board of directors; and

a voting member has one vote, and a vote may not be cast by proxy.

The supreme governing body may be constituted in an assembly. The assembly is composed of delegates elected directly by the members or at intermediate assemblies or conventions of members or their representatives, together with other delegates prescribed in the society’s laws. A society may provide for election of delegates by mail. The elected delegates shall constitute a majority of the delegates entitled to vote, and they shall have neither less than two-thirds of the total votes cast, nor less than the number of votes required to amend the society’s laws. The assembly shall be elected, shall meet at least once every four years, and shall elect a board of directors to conduct the business of the society between meetings of the assembly. Vacancies on the board of directors between elections may be filled in the manner prescribed by the society’s laws.

The supreme governing body may be constituted in a board. The board is composed of persons elected by the members, either directly or by their representatives in intermediate assemblies, together with other persons prescribed in the society’s laws. A society may provide for election of the board by mail. A term of a board member may not exceed four years. Vacancies on the board between elections may be filled in the manner prescribed by the society’s laws. The elected board members shall constitute a majority of the number of directors entitled to vote, and they shall have not less than the number of votes required to amend the society’s laws. A person filling the unexpired term of an elected board member shall be considered to be an elected member. The board shall meet at least quarterly to conduct the business of the society.

History.

(§ 1 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.010.
Chapter exclusive. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.015.
Purposes and powers.

A society shall operate for the benefit of members and their beneficiaries by (1) providing benefits as specified in AS

21.84.201

, and (2) operating for a social, intellectual, educational, charitable, benevolent, moral, fraternal, patriotic, or religious purpose for the benefit of its members, which benefits may also be extended to others. A purpose may be carried out directly by the society or indirectly through subsidiary corporations or affiliated organizations.

A society may adopt and amend laws and rules for the government of the society, the admission of its members, and the management of its affairs and may have other powers necessary to carrying into effect the objects and purposes of the society.

History.

(§ 1 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.020.
Exempted societies. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]